3rdParty/snowball/algorithms/arabic.sbl
define Prefix_Step2 as (
        not '{f}{a}'
        not '{w}{a}'
        [substring] among (
            '{f}' ($(len > 3) delete)
            '{w}' ($(len > 3) delete)
        )
)

define Prefix_Step3a_Noun as ( // it is noun and defined
        [substring] among (
            '{b}{a}{l}' '{k}{a}{l}' ($(len > 5) delete)
            '{l}{l}' '{a}{l}' ($(len > 4) delete)
        )
)

define Prefix_Step3b_Noun as ( // probably  noun and defined
        not '{b}{a}' // exception
        [substring] among (
            '{b}' ($(len > 3) delete)
            // '{k}'  '{l}' ($(len > 3) delete) // BUG: cause confusion
            '{b}{b}' ($(len > 3) <-  '{b}'  )
            '{k}{k}'  ($(len > 3) <-  '{k}'  )
           )

)

define Prefix_Step3_Verb as (
        [substring] among (
            //'{s}' ($(len > 4) delete)// BUG: cause confusion
            '{s}{y}' ($(len > 4) <- '{y}' )
            '{s}{t}' ($(len > 4) <- '{t}')
            '{s}{n}' ($(len > 4) <- '{n}')
            '{s}{ao}' ($(len > 4) <- '{ao}')
        )
)

define Prefix_Step4_Verb as (
        [substring] among (
            '{y}{s}{t}' '{n}{s}{t}' '{t}{s}{t}' ($(len > 4) set is_verb unset is_noun <-  '{a}{s}{t}' )
        )
)

// suffixes
backwardmode (

        define Suffix_Noun_Step1a as (
                [substring] among (
                        '{y}' '{k}' '{e}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
                        '{n}{a}' '{k}{m}' '{e}{a}' '{e}{n}' '{e}{m}' ($(len >= 5)  delete)
                        '{k}{m}{a}' '{e}{m}{a}' ($(len >= 6) delete)
                )
            )
        define Suffix_Noun_Step1b as (
            [substring] among (
                '{n}' ($(len > 5) delete)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_Noun_Step2a as (
                [substring] among (
                        '{a}' '{y}' '{w}' ($(len > 4) delete)
                )
            )

        define Suffix_Noun_Step2b as (
            [substring] among (
                '{a}{t}' ($(len >= 5) delete)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_Noun_Step2c1 as (
            [substring] among (
                '{t}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
            )
        )
        define Suffix_Noun_Step2c2 as ( // feminine t_
            [substring] among (
                '{t_}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
            )
        )
        define Suffix_Noun_Step3 as ( // ya' nisbiya
            [substring] among (
                '{y}' ($(len >= 3) delete)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_Verb_Step1 as (
                [substring] among (
                        '{e}' '{k}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
                        '{n}{y}' '{n}{a}' '{e}{a}' '{e}{m}' '{e}{n}' '{k}{m}' '{k}{n}' ($(len >= 5) delete)
                        '{e}{m}{a}' '{k}{m}{a}' '{k}{m}{w}'($(len >= 6) delete)
                )
            )
        define Suffix_Verb_Step2a as (
                [substring] among (
                       '{t}' ($(len >= 4)  delete)
                        '{a}' '{n}' '{y}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
                        '{n}{a}' '{t}{a}'  '{t}{n}'  ($(len >= 5) delete)// past
                        '{a}{n}' '{w}{n}' '{y}{n}' ($(len > 5) delete) // present
                        '{t}{m}{a}' ($(len >= 6) delete)
                )
            )

        define Suffix_Verb_Step2b as (
            [substring] among (
                '{w}{a}' '{t}{m}' ($(len >= 5) delete)
            )
        )


        define Suffix_Verb_Step2c as (
            [substring] among (
                '{w}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
                '{t}{m}{w}' ($(len >= 6) delete)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_All_alef_maqsura as (
            [substring] among (
                '{a_}' ( <- '{y}' ) // spell error
                // '{a_}' ( delete ) // if noun > 3
                // '{a_}' ( <- '{a}') // if verb
            )
        )
)

define stem as (
    // set initial values
    set is_noun
    set is_verb
    unset is_defined

    // guess type and properties
    do Checks1

    // normalization pre-stemming
    do Normalize_pre


    backwards (

       do (
              //Suffixes for verbs
            (
           is_verb
           (
               (
                  (atleast 1 Suffix_Verb_Step1)
                  ( Suffix_Verb_Step2a or Suffix_Verb_Step2c  or next)
                )
                or Suffix_Verb_Step2b
                or Suffix_Verb_Step2a
            )
           )
            //Suffixes for nouns
          or (
               is_noun
                (

                 try (
                     Suffix_Noun_Step2c2
                     or (not is_defined Suffix_Noun_Step1a (
                            Suffix_Noun_Step2a
                            or Suffix_Noun_Step2b
                            or Suffix_Noun_Step2c1
                            or next))
                     or (Suffix_Noun_Step1b (
                            Suffix_Noun_Step2a
                            or Suffix_Noun_Step2b
                            or Suffix_Noun_Step2c1))
                     or (not is_defined Suffix_Noun_Step2a)
                     or (Suffix_Noun_Step2b)
                 )
                 Suffix_Noun_Step3
                 )

            )

            // Suffixes for alef maqsura
            or  Suffix_All_alef_maqsura
        )
    )

    //Prefixes
    do (
       try Prefix_Step1
       try Prefix_Step2
       ( Prefix_Step3a_Noun
         or (is_noun Prefix_Step3b_Noun)
         or (is_verb try Prefix_Step3_Verb Prefix_Step4_Verb)
         )
    )

    // normalization post-stemming
    do Normalize_post

)
